tr: Çeyrek panel kapsama türü: Kapı pervazı onarım parçası; Tam çamurluk paneli (komple); Alt ön onarım yaması; Alt arka onarım yaması; Çamurluk dış sacı; Marşpiyelden çamurluğa onarım parçası; Bagaj pervazı onarım parçası; Üst çamurluk onarım parçası; Çamurluk davlumbazı onarım parçası; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta pokrivenosti zadnjeg blatobrana: Dio za popravak okvira vrata; Cijela stražnja bočna stranica (kompletna); Donja prednja zakrpa za popravak; Donja stražnja zakrpa za popravak; Oplata stražnje bočne stranice (vanjska oplata); Dio za popravak od praga do stražnje bočne stranice; Dio za popravak okvira prtljažnika; Gornji dio za popravak stražnje bočne stranice; Dio za popravak luka kotača; Ostalo
lt-LT: Galinio sparno dengimo tipas: Durų staktos remonto sekcija; Visas galinis sparnas (pilnas); Apatinis priekinis remonto lopas; Apatinis galinis remonto lopas; Galinio sparno danga (išorinė); Slenksčio ir galinio sparno jungties remonto sekcija; Bagažinės angos remonto sekcija; Viršutinė galinio sparno remonto sekcija; Rato arkos remonto sekcija; Kita
vi: Loại che phủ tấm chắn bên hông: Phần sửa chữa rầm cửa; Toàn bộ tấm thân sau (đầy đủ); Miếng vá sửa chữa phần trước dưới; Miếng vá sửa chữa phần sau dưới; Vỏ thân sau (vỏ ngoài); Phần sửa chữa thanh dọc tới thân sau; Phần sửa chữa nẹp cốp xe; Phần sửa chữa thân sau phía trên; Phần sửa chữa hốc bánh xe; Khác
nb: Dekningstype for kvartpanel: Reparasjonsseksjon for dørkarm; Komplett bakskjerm; Nedre fremre reparasjonslapp; Nedre bakre reparasjonslapp; Bakskjermplate (ytre plate); Reparasjonsseksjon kanal til bakskjerm; Reparasjonsseksjon for bagasjeromskarm; Øvre reparasjonsseksjon for bakskjerm; Reparasjonsseksjon for hjulbue; Annet
fr: Étendue du panneau de custode: Section de réparation de montant de porte; Panneau de custode complet; Pièce de réparation avant inférieure; Pièce de réparation arrière inférieure; Revêtement de custode (revêtement extérieur); Section de réparation du bas de caisse à la custode; Section de réparation du montant de coffre; Section de réparation supérieure de custode; Section de réparation de passage de roue; Autre
ja: クォーターパネルカバータイプ: ドアジャム修理セクション; フルクォーターパネル (コンプリート); ロアフロント修理パッチ; ロアリア修理パッチ; クォータースキン (アウタースキン); ロッカートゥクォーター修理セクション; トランクジャム修理セクション; アッパークォーター修理セクション; ホイールアーチ修理セクション; その他
sv: Täckningstyp för kvartspanel: Reparationsdel för dörrkarm; Hel bakskärm (komplett); Nedre främre reparationslapp; Nedre bakre reparationslapp; Bakskärmsplåt (yttre plåt); Reparationsdel mellan tröskel och skärm; Reparationsdel för bagageluckekarm; Övre reparationsdel för bakskärm; Reparationsdel för hjulhus; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de cobertura do painel lateral: Secção de reparação de ombreira de porta; Painel lateral traseiro inteiro (completo); Remendo de reparação frontal inferior; Remendo de reparação traseiro inferior; Revestimento lateral traseiro (revestimento exterior); Secção de reparação de embaladeira para painel lateral traseiro; Secção de reparação de ombreira de bagageira; Secção de reparação de painel lateral traseiro superior; Secção de reparação de arco de roda; Outro
ru: Тип покрытия четверти кузова: Ремонтная часть дверного проема; Полная боковина кузова (в сборе); Нижняя передняя ремонтная вставка; Нижняя задняя ремонтная вставка; Облицовка боковины кузова (наружная панель); Ремонтная часть перехода порога в боковину; Ремонтная часть проема багажника; Верхняя ремонтная часть боковины кузова; Ремонтная часть колесной арки; Другое
da: Dækningstype for kvartpanel: Reparationssektion til dørfals; Fuld bagskærm (komplet); Nederste forreste reparationslap; Nederste bagerste reparationslap; Bagskærm (yderskærm); Reparationssektion fra panel til bagskærm; Reparationssektion til bagagerumsfals; Øverste bagskærm reparationssektion; Reparationssektion til hjulkasse; Andet
el: Τύπος κάλυψης πίσω πλαϊνού φτερού: Τμήμα επισκευής παραστάτη πόρτας; Πλήρες πίσω πλαϊνό πάνελ (ολοκληρωμένο); Κάτω μπροστινό μπάλωμα επισκευής; Κάτω πίσω μπάλωμα επισκευής; Επένδυση πίσω πλαϊνού (εξωτερική επένδυση); Τμήμα επισκευής μαρσπιέ προς πίσω πλαϊνό; Τμήμα επισκευής πλαισίου πορτμπαγκάζ; Επάνω τμήμα επισκευής πίσω πλαϊνού; Τμήμα επισκευής θόλου τροχού; Άλλο
it: Tipo di copertura del pannello laterale: Sezione di riparazione montante portiera; Pannello laterale intero (completo); Pezza di riparazione anteriore inferiore; Pezza di riparazione posteriore inferiore; Rivestimento laterale (rivestimento esterno); Sezione di riparazione da sottoporta a pannello laterale; Sezione di riparazione montante bagagliaio; Sezione di riparazione laterale superiore; Sezione di riparazione passaruota; Altro
th: แบบครอบคลุมแผงบริเวณนี้: ชิ้นส่วนซ่อมแซมกรอบประตู; แผงตัวถังด้านท้ายแบบเต็ม (ครบชุด); แผ่นปะซ่อมแซมส่วนหน้าด้านล่าง; แผ่นปะซ่อมแซมส่วนท้ายด้านล่าง; ผิวแผงตัวถังด้านท้าย (ผิวชั้นนอก); ชิ้นส่วนซ่อมแซมจากบันไดข้างถึงแผงตัวถังด้านท้าย; ชิ้นส่วนซ่อมแซมกรอบฝากระโปรงท้าย; ชิ้นส่วนซ่อมแซมแผงตัวถังด้านท้ายส่วนบน; ชิ้นส่วนซ่อมแซมซุ้มล้อ; อื่นๆ
ko: 쿼터 패널 적용 범위 유형: 도어 잼 수리 부위; 쿼터 패널 전체(완제품); 하단 전면 수리 패치; 하단 후면 수리 패치; 쿼터 스킨(외부 스킨); 로커-쿼터 수리 부위; 트렁크 잼 수리 부위; 상단 쿼터 수리 부위; 휠 아치 수리 부위; 기타
zh-CN: 后侧围板覆盖类型: 门柱维修部分; 全四分之一侧板（完整）; 前下部维修贴片; 后下部维修贴片; 四分之一侧板蒙皮（外蒙皮）; 门槛至四分之一侧板维修部分; 行李箱柱维修部分; 四分之一侧板上部维修部分; 轮拱维修部分; 其他
en: Quarter panel coverage type: Door jamb repair section; Full quarter panel (complete); Lower front repair patch; Lower rear repair patch; Quarter skin (outer skin); Rocker-to-quarter repair section; Trunk jamb repair section; Upper quarter repair section; Wheel arch repair section; Other
pt-BR: Painel lateral traseiro tipo de cobertura: Seção de reparo do batente da porta; Painel lateral traseiro completo; Remendo de reparo frontal inferior; Remendo de reparo traseiro inferior; Revestimento lateral (revestimento externo); Seção de reparo da soleira à lateral; Seção de reparo do batente do porta-malas; Seção de reparo lateral superior; Seção de reparo da caixa de roda; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de acoperire a unui sfert de panou: Secțiune de reparație pentru stâlpul ușii; Panou aripă spate (complet); Petic de reparație față inferior; Petic de reparație spate inferior; Foaie exterioară aripă spate; Secțiune de reparație prag-aripă; Secțiune de reparație stâlp portbagaj; Secțiune de reparație aripă superioară; Secțiune de reparație arcadă roată; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta pokritosti blatnika: Del za popravilo podboja vrat; Celotna zadnja bočna stranica (komplet); Spodnja sprednja zaplata za popravilo; Spodnja zadnja zaplata za popravilo; Obloga bočne stranice (zunanja obloga); Del za popravilo od praga do bočne stranice; Del za popravilo podboja prtljažnika; Zgornji del za popravilo bočne stranice; Del za popravilo kolesnega loka; Drugo
pl: Typ pokrycia ćwiartki nadwozia: Reperaturka słupka drzwiowego; Pełny panel boczny tylny (kompletny); Dolna przednia reperaturka; Dolna tylna reperaturka; Poszycie panelu bocznego (poszycie zewnętrzne); Reperaturka łączenia progu z panelem bocznym; Reperaturka wnęki bagażnika; Górna reperaturka panelu bocznego; Reperaturka nadkola; Inne
cs: Typ pokrytí čtvrtpanelu: Opravný díl sloupku dveří; Celý zadní blatník (kompletní); Spodní přední opravná záplata; Spodní zadní opravná záplata; Vnější plech blatníku; Opravný díl přechodu prahu a blatníku; Opravný díl hrany kufru; Horní opravný díl blatníku; Opravný díl lemu blatníku; Jiné
hu: Oldalfal lefedettségi típusa: Ajtóoszlop-javító profil; Teljes negyedlemez (komplett); Alsó elülső javítófolt; Alsó hátsó javítófolt; Negyedlemez héj (külső héj); Küszöb és negyedlemez javító profil; Csomagtartó-perem javító profil; Felső negyedlemez javító profil; Kerékjárati ív javító profil; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип покритие на задния калник: Секция за ремонт на колонката на вратата; Цял заден калник (пълен); Долна предна ремонтна кръпка; Долна задна ремонтна кръпка; Външна част на калник (външна обвивка); Секция за ремонт от прага до калника; Секция за ремонт на рамката на багажника; Горна секция за ремонт на калника; Секция за ремонт на арката на калника; Друго
nl: Kwartpaneel dekkingstype: Reparatiedeel deurpost; Compleet zijpaneel achter; Reparatiepatch onderkant voor; Reparatiepatch onderkant achter; Zijpaneelhuid (buitenhuid); Reparatiedeel dorpel naar zijpaneel; Reparatiedeel kofferbakrand; Reparatiedeel bovenkant zijpaneel; Reparatiedeel wielkast; Overig
zh-TW: 後側圍板覆蓋類型: 車門柱修復板; 全葉子板 (完整); 前下修補板; 後下修補板; 葉子板蒙皮 (外板); 門檻至葉子板修復板; 後車廂柱修復板; 上葉子板修復板; 輪拱修復板; 其他
es: Tipo de cobertura del panel de cuarto: Sección de reparación de jamba de puerta; Panel lateral trasero (completo); Parche de reparación frontal inferior; Parche de reparación trasero inferior; Revestimiento del panel lateral (exterior); Sección de reparación de estribo a panel lateral; Sección de reparación de jamba de maletero; Sección de reparación superior del panel lateral; Sección de reparación de paso de rueda; Otro
de: Abdeckungsart des Seitenwandbereichs: Türpfosten-Reparaturblech; Ganzes Seitenteil (komplett); Reparaturblech unten vorne; Reparaturblech unten hinten; Seitenteil-Blech (Außenhaut); Reparaturblech Schweller zu Seitenteil; Kofferraumholm-Reparaturblech; Oberes Seitenteil-Reparaturblech; Radlauf-Reparaturblech; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ pokrytia štvrťového panela: Časť na opravu rámu dverí; Celý zadný blatník (kompletný); Spodná predná záplata na opravu; Spodná zadná záplata na opravu; Opláštenie blatníka (vonkajšie); Časť na opravu od podbehu k blatníku; Časť na opravu rámu kufra; Vrchná časť na opravu blatníka; Časť na opravu blatníkového oblúka; Iné
fi: Takalokasuojan peittävyys: Ovikarmin korjausosa; Koko takalokasuoja (täydellinen); Alempi etukorjauspala; Alempi takakorjauspala; Takalokasuojan pintapelti (ulkopinta); Kynnyskotelon ja takalokasuojan korjausosa; Tavaratilan karmin korjausosa; Ylemmän takalokasuojan korjausosa; Pyöränkaaren korjausosa; Muu